gc_lang/fr/dictionnaire/orthographe/FRANCAIS_7.aff
FLAG long
# croître [I] (1) | décroître [I] | recroître [I]
# + formes de la réforme de R
SFX wT Y 78
SFX wT   tre        tre/n'q'd'l'm't's'          tre                 po:infi
SFX wT   roître     roissant/n'q'd'l'm't's'     croître             po:ppre                   di:M
SFX wT   roitre     roissant/n'q'd'l'm't's'     croitre             po:ppre                   di:R
SFX wT   roître     rû/L'D'Q'                   recroître           po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg      di:M
SFX wT   roître     rûs/D'Q'                    recroître           po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl      di:M
SFX wT   roître     rûe/L'D'Q'                  recroître           po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg      di:M
SFX wT   roître     rûes/D'Q'                   recroître           po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl      di:M
SFX wT   roître     ru/L'D'Q'                   décroître           po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg      di:M
SFX wT   roître     rus/D'Q'                    décroître           po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl      di:M
SFX wT   roître     rue/L'D'Q'                  décroître           po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg      di:M
SFX wT   roître     rues/D'Q'                   décroître           po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl      di:M
SFX wT   roitre     ru/L'D'Q'                   .croitre            po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg      di:R
SFX wT   roitre     rus/D'Q'                    .croitre            po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl      di:R
SFX wT   roitre     rue/L'D'Q'                  .croitre            po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg      di:R
SFX wT   roitre     rues/D'Q'                   .croitre            po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl      di:R
SFX wT   roître     rois/j'n'q'l'm't'           .croître            po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg     di:M
SFX wT   roître     roît/n'q'l'm't's'           .croître            po:ipre po:3sg            di:M
SFX wT   roître     roissons/n'q'l't'           croître             po:ipre po:1pl            di:M
SFX wT   roître     roissez/n'q'l'm'            croître             po:ipre po:2pl            di:M
SFX wT   roître     roissent/n'q'l'm't's'       croître             po:ipre po:spre po:3pl    di:M
SFX wT   roitre     rois/j'n'q'l'm't'           .croitre            po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg     di:R
SFX wT   roitre     roit/n'q'l'm't's'           .croitre            po:ipre po:3sg            di:R
SFX wT   roitre     roissons/n'q'l't'           croitre             po:ipre po:1pl            di:R
SFX wT   roitre     roissez/n'q'l'm'            croitre             po:ipre po:2pl            di:R
SFX wT   roitre     roissent/n'q'l'm't's'       croitre             po:ipre po:spre po:3pl    di:R
SFX wT   roître     roissais/j'n'q'l'm't'       croître             po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg     di:M
SFX wT   roître     roissait/n'q'l'm't's'       croître             po:iimp po:3sg            di:M
SFX wT   roître     roissions/n'q'l't'          croître             po:iimp po:spre po:1pl    di:M
SFX wT   roître     roissiez/n'q'l'm'           croître             po:iimp po:spre po:2pl    di:M
SFX wT   roître     roissaient/n'q'l'm't's'     croître             po:iimp po:3pl            di:M
SFX wT   roitre     roissais/j'n'q'l'm't'       croitre             po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg     di:R
SFX wT   roitre     roissait/n'q'l'm't's'       croitre             po:iimp po:3sg            di:R
SFX wT   roitre     roissions/n'q'l't'          croitre             po:iimp po:spre po:1pl    di:R
SFX wT   roitre     roissiez/n'q'l'm'           croitre             po:iimp po:spre po:2pl    di:R
SFX wT   roitre     roissaient/n'q'l'm't's'     croitre             po:iimp po:3pl            di:R
SFX wT   roître     rus/j'n'q'l'm't'            .croître            po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg     di:M
SFX wT   roître     rut/n'q'l'm't's'            .croître            po:ipsi po:3sg            di:M
SFX wT   roître     rûmes/n'q'l't'              croître             po:ipsi po:1pl            di:M
SFX wT   roître     rûtes/n'q'l'm'              croître             po:ipsi po:2pl            di:M
SFX wT   roître     rurent/n'q'l'm't's'         .croître            po:ipsi po:3pl!           di:M
SFX wT   roitre     rus/j'n'q'l'm't'            .croitre            po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg     di:R
SFX wT   roitre     rut/n'q'l'm't's'            .croitre            po:ipsi po:3sg            di:R
SFX wT   roitre     rûmes/n'q'l't'              croitre             po:ipsi po:1pl            di:R
SFX wT   roitre     rûtes/n'q'l'm'              croitre             po:ipsi po:2pl            di:R
SFX wT   roitre     rurent/n'q'l'm't's'         .croitre            po:ipsi po:3pl!           di:R
SFX wT   tre        trai/j'n'q'l'm't'           tre                 po:ifut po:1sg
SFX wT   tre        tras/n'q'l'm't'             tre                 po:ifut po:2sg
SFX wT   tre        tra/n'q'l'm't's'            tre                 po:ifut po:3sg
SFX wT   tre        trons/n'q'l't'              tre                 po:ifut po:1pl
SFX wT   tre        trez/n'q'l'm'               tre                 po:ifut po:2pl
SFX wT   tre        tront/n'q'l'm't's'          tre                 po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX wT   tre        trais/j'n'q'l'm't'          tre                 po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wT   tre        trait/n'q'l'm't's'          tre                 po:cond po:3sg
SFX wT   tre        trions/n'q'l't'             tre                 po:cond po:1pl
SFX wT   tre        triez/n'q'l'm'              tre                 po:cond po:2pl
SFX wT   tre        traient/n'q'l'm't's'        tre                 po:cond po:3pl
SFX wT   roître     roisse/j'n'q'l'm't's'       croître             po:spre po:1sg po:3sg     di:M
SFX wT   roître     roisses/n'q'l'm't'          croître             po:spre po:2sg            di:M
SFX wT   roitre     roisse/j'n'q'l'm't's'       croitre             po:spre po:1sg po:3sg     di:R
SFX wT   roitre     roisses/n'q'l'm't'          croitre             po:spre po:2sg            di:R
SFX wT   roître     russe/j'n'q'l'm't'          .croître            po:simp po:1sg            di:M
SFX wT   roître     russes/n'q'l'm't'           .croître            po:simp po:2sg            di:M
SFX wT   roître     rût/n'q'l'm't's'            croître             po:simp po:3sg            di:M
SFX wT   roître     russions/n'q'l't'           .croître            po:simp po:1pl            di:M
SFX wT   roître     russiez/n'q'l'm'            .croître            po:simp po:2pl            di:M
SFX wT   roître     russent/n'q'l'm't's'        .croître            po:simp po:3pl            di:M
SFX wT   roitre     russe/j'n'q'l'm't'          .croitre            po:simp po:1sg            di:R
SFX wT   roitre     russes/n'q'l'm't'           .croitre            po:simp po:2sg            di:R
SFX wT   roitre     rût/n'q'l'm't's'            croitre             po:simp po:3sg            di:R
SFX wT   roitre     russions/n'q'l't'           .croitre            po:simp po:1pl            di:R
SFX wT   roitre     russiez/n'q'l'm'            .croitre            po:simp po:2pl            di:R
SFX wT   roitre     russent/n'q'l'm't's'        .croitre            po:simp po:3pl            di:R
SFX wT   roître     rois/n'l'm't'               .croître            po:impe po:2sg            di:M
SFX wT   roître     roissons/n'l't'             croître             po:impe po:1pl            di:M
SFX wT   roître     roissez/n'l'm'              croître             po:impe po:2pl            di:M
SFX wT   roitre     rois/n'l'm't'               .croitre            po:impe po:2sg            di:R
SFX wT   roitre     roissons/n'l't'             croitre             po:impe po:1pl            di:R
SFX wT   roitre     roissez/n'l'm'              croitre             po:impe po:2pl            di:R

# croître [I] (2)
# + formes de la réforme de 1990
SFX wU Y 30
SFX wU   roître     rû/L'D'Q'                   croître             po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg      di:M
SFX wU   roître     rûs/D'Q'                    croître             po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl      di:M
SFX wU   roître     rûe/L'D'Q'                  croître             po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg      di:M
SFX wU   roître     rûes/D'Q'                   croître             po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl      di:M
SFX wU   roitre     rû/L'D'Q'                   croitre             po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg      di:R
SFX wU   roitre     rûs/D'Q'                    croitre             po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl      di:R
SFX wU   roitre     rûe/L'D'Q'                  croitre             po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg      di:R
SFX wU   roitre     rûes/D'Q'                   croitre             po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl      di:R
SFX wU   roître     roîs/j'n'q'l'm't'           croître             po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg     di:M
SFX wU   roître     roît/n'q'l'm't's'           croître             po:ipre po:3sg            di:M
SFX wU   roitre     roîs/j'n'q'l'm't'           croitre             po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg     di:R
SFX wU   roitre     roît/n'q'l'm't's'           croitre             po:ipre po:3sg            di:R
SFX wU   roître     rûs/j'n'q'l'm't'            croître             po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg     di:M
SFX wU   roître     rût/n'q'l'm't's'            croître             po:ipsi po:3sg            di:M
SFX wU   roître     rûrent/n'q'l'm't's'         croître             po:ipsi po:3pl!           di:M
SFX wU   roitre     rûs/j'n'q'l'm't'            croitre             po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg     di:R
SFX wU   roitre     rût/n'q'l'm't's'            croitre             po:ipsi po:3sg            di:R
SFX wU   roitre     rûrent/n'q'l'm't's'         croitre             po:ipsi po:3pl!           di:R
SFX wU   roître     rûsse/j'n'q'l'm't'          croître             po:simp po:1sg            di:M
SFX wU   roître     rûsses/n'q'l'm't'           croître             po:simp po:2sg            di:M
SFX wU   roître     rûssions/n'q'l't'           croître             po:simp po:1pl            di:M
SFX wU   roître     rûssiez/n'q'l'm'            croître             po:simp po:2pl            di:M
SFX wU   roître     rûssent/n'q'l'm't's'        croître             po:simp po:3pl            di:M
SFX wU   roitre     rûsse/j'n'q'l'm't'          croitre             po:simp po:1sg            di:R
SFX wU   roitre     rûsses/n'q'l'm't'           croitre             po:simp po:2sg            di:R
SFX wU   roitre     rûssions/n'q'l't'           croitre             po:simp po:1pl            di:R
SFX wU   roitre     rûssiez/n'q'l'm'            croitre             po:simp po:2pl            di:R
SFX wU   roitre     rûssent/n'q'l'm't's'        croitre             po:simp po:3pl            di:R
SFX wU   roître     roîs/n'l'm't'               croître             po:impe po:2sg            di:M
SFX wU   roitre     roîs/n'l'm't'               croitre             po:impe po:2sg            di:R
